Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.10
Child support; withholding of earnings; order; dissolution; revocation; modification; service.

An order to withhold and transmit earnings shall dissolve without any court action thirty days after the parent-employee ceases employment with the employer. An order to withhold and transmit earnings may be revoked by the court upon application when the parent-employee is not in arrears of any court-ordered child support as of the date of the application. An order to withhold and transmit earnings may be modified or revoked by the court upon application and for good cause shown. All applications to revoke or modify shall be served upon the employer and all persons having an interest in the order to withhold and transmit earnings, by United States certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the last-known addresses of such persons.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 15;

Laws 1983, LB 371, § 7.